Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5960XC (3) 91 jm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.35, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 12. Subtract, to the extent included, global intangible 3 low-taxed income under section 951A of the Internal Revenue 4 Code. 5 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 6 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 7 or after that date. 8